California statutes. Water Code
(b) Six of the directors shall be qualified for office by being persons who hold title to land within the district or persons authorized to vote in elections by landowners, as provided in Section 37913. Each director shall be elected by landowners within the district as provided by Article 1 (commencing with Section 35003) of Chapter 1 of Part 4, except that each voter shall be entitled to cast one vote for each acre owned by the voter within the district. If the voter owns less than one acre, the voter shall be entitled to one vote and any
 fraction shall be rounded to the nearest full acre.

(1) For the purposes of election of the six directors described by this subdivision, landowners within the district shall be divided into three classes as follows:

(A) “Large landowners,” meaning holders of title owning a total of 400 acres or more.

(B) “Medium landowners,” meaning holders of title owning a total of 40 acres or more but less than 400 acres.

(C) “Small landowners,” meaning holders of title owning a total of less than 40 acres of land.

(2) Of the six directors elected pursuant to this subdivision, large landowners shall elect two directors, medium landowners shall elect two directors, and small landowners shall elect two
 directors.

(3) Candidates for the six directors elected pursuant to this subdivision may be within any landowner class.

(c) Three of the directors shall be elected by registered voters within the district at large.

(d) (1) All directors qualified under subdivision (b) shall reside within the district, within two miles of the district boundary, or within the boundaries of the City of Paso Robles, the Atascadero Mutual Water Company, the Templeton Community Services District, the San Miguel Community Services District, or the San Luis Obispo County Service Area 16.

(2) All directors qualified under subdivision (c) shall
 be registered voters residing within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37912.

District elections shall be conducted in conformance with the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) and the laws generally applicable to districts created and operated pursuant to this division, provided the following shall apply:

(a) Separate ballots shall be prepared and separate elections shall be conducted for those director positions which will be elected by resident voters and for those which will be elected by landowner voters. Notwithstanding Section 10555 of the Elections Code, these landowner voter elections and resident voter elections shall be conducted simultaneously.

(b) District elections
 shall be conducted by all-mailed ballots pursuant to Section 4108 of the Elections Code. Separate voter lists of resident voters and landowner voters eligible to vote within the district shall be prepared and maintained according to applicable provisions of law, including Section 10525 of the Elections Code. Separate all-mailed ballot elections shall be held for the directors to be elected by resident voters and for those to be elected by landowner voters.

(c) The directors elected upon formation of the district shall hold office pursuant to Section 10505 of the Elections Code. For the purposes of implementing this section, the director positions elected by large landowners shall be divided into two director term classes, the directors elected by medium landowners shall be divided into two director term classes, the directors elected by small landowners shall be divided into two director term classes,
 and the directors elected by registered voters shall be divided into two director term classes.

(d) Elections of directors shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in October of each odd-numbered year.

(e) The voters list used for the purpose of an election of directors shall be based upon the last assessment roll prepared by the county assessor, which shall be conclusive evidence of ownership and the acreage for purposes of electing directors in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 37911. The voters list shall be amended if satisfactory evidence of a change in ownership is presented at least 45 days prior to the election to the elections official in the case of the formation election, and thereafter to the district secretary. The county assessor shall be reimbursed by the district for all costs incurred in determining the ownership and acreage information
 and providing the information to the county clerk.

(f) For purposes of the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code), the district is a landowner voting district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37913.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division or the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code), for the purposes of election participation by landowners, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Landowner” means any person who holds title to land within the boundaries of the proposed district as shown on the last assessment roll prepared by the county assessor, or a legal representative of a landowner who holds title to land within the boundaries of the proposed district as shown on the last assessment roll prepared by the county assessor.

(b) “Landowner” does not include
 individuals, partnerships, corporations, or public agencies holding easements or less than fee interests, including leaseholds of any nature.

(c) “Legal representative” means either of the following:

(1) A duly appointed and acting guardian, executor, or administrator of the estate of a holder of title to land.

(2) One of the following:

(A) If the holder of title is a trust, any trustee of the trust may vote on behalf of the trust.

(B) If the holder of title is a corporation, the president, vice president, secretary, or other duly designated officer may vote on behalf of the corporation.

(C) If the holder of title is a
 limited liability company, any managing member may vote on behalf of the limited liability company.

(D) An officer or partner with managerial responsibilities of a legal entity not listed in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, may vote on behalf of the entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Groundwater Management Authority [37920. - 37931.]

37920.

All powers in this part are subject to review and approval by the San Luis Obispo County Local Agency Formation Commission, upon formation, change of organization, or reorganization under the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37921.

The board may adopt ordinances for the purpose of regulating, conserving, managing, and controlling the use and extraction of groundwater within the territory of the district. All ordinances shall be adopted, after noticed public hearings by a majority vote of the board. Notice of the adoption of all ordinances shall be given. The ordinances of the district shall become effective on the 31st day after adoption except that the board may, by the vote of at least seven members of the board, dispense with notice of public hearing and adopt an emergency ordinance that shall become effective immediately upon adoption, if the board determines that the public health, safety, or welfare so requires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 42.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

37922.

Any person who intentionally violates any provision of this act or any district ordinance shall be guilty of an infraction and may be required to pay a fine to the district not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37923.

Any person who negligently or intentionally violates any provision of this act or any district ordinance may also be liable civilly to the district for a sum not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day of violation, in addition to any other penalties that may be prescribed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37924.

Upon the failure of any person to comply with any provision of this act or any district ordinance, the district may petition the superior court for a temporary restraining order, preliminary or permanent injunction, or other equitable relief as may be appropriate. The right to petition for injunctive relief is an additional right to those that may be provided elsewhere in this act or otherwise allowed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37925.

The district may petition the superior court of the county to recover any sums due the district. In order to preserve and manage the groundwater resources within its territory, the district may also commence, maintain, intervene in, defend, compromise, and assume the costs and expenses of legal actions and administrative proceedings now or hereafter begun involving groundwater, including, but not limited to, groundwater rights adjudication.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37926.

The district may contract with the county, the San Luis Obispo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, or other local district for staff and other services and may hire other contractors and consultants as it considers appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37927.

The district may exclude from any of the requirements of this act, or the operation of any ordinance, any operator who extracts less than a minimum amount of groundwater as specified by ordinance adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37928.

The district may collect data and conduct technical and other investigations deemed necessary in order to carry out the provisions of this act. All hydrological investigations and studies carried out by or on behalf of the district shall be conducted by or under the supervision of licensed engineers or other persons qualified in groundwater geology or hydrology.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37929.

The district may prepare annually or receive reports on groundwater and supplemental water supplies and conditions in the territory of the district, including groundwater management and conjunctive use objectives and a plan for implementation of those objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37930.

The district may recommend and encourage wastewater reuse and other water development projects, if those projects will enhance and contribute to the responsible management of groundwater resources, as part of its annual plan for implementation of groundwater management objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37931.

In addition to the powers identified here, the district shall have the authority afforded to local agencies as provided in Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750) of Division 6 as that part may be amended, consistent with the requirements and limitations of applicable law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Groundwater Management Plans [37940. - 37942.]

37940.

In order to balance the water supply and demand within the Paso Robles Groundwater Basin, the district may do the following:

(a) Develop, adopt, and implement a groundwater management plan to control extractions from the Paso Robles Groundwater Basin aquifers with the objective of balancing water supply and demand in the region.

(b) The groundwater management plan may also include and address the following:

(1) Existing groundwater
 storage.

(2) Long-term recoverable storage, including an estimate of nonrecoverable storage.

(3) The expected adverse effects of projected extractions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37941.

The groundwater management plan may establish distinct zones or regions based on the geology of the basin, land use, water use, the location of extraction facilities, or other concerns as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37942.

The groundwater management plan may include a policy for the issuance of new well permits that takes into consideration the location of proposed wells and area of use, projected extractions from the wells, and the effect of the extractions on existing users and on storage. In developing the management plan, the district may consider a ban on new irrigated acreage or new municipal water system wells. The district may include a contingency plan to deal with seawater intrusion, basin contamination, or other risks that could impair the ability to rely on the basin for groundwater.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Groundwater management [37950. - 37955.]

37950.

If the board determines after a noticed public hearing, and consideration of any relevant investigations, studies, and evidence, that groundwater management activities are necessary in order to improve or protect the quantity or quality of groundwater supplies within a groundwater basin or aquifer, the board may, by ordinance, exercise any of the following powers:

(a) Require conservation practices and measures within the affected portion of its territory.

(b) Control groundwater extractions by regulating, limiting, or suspending extractions from extraction facilities, the construction of new extraction facilities, the enlarging of existing extraction facilities, and the reactivation of abandoned
 extraction facilities.

(c) Commence and prosecute legal actions to enjoin unreasonable uses or methods of use of water within the district or outside the territory of the district to the extent those uses or methods of use adversely affect the groundwater supply within the district.

(d) Impose spacing requirements on new extraction facility construction to minimize well interference.

(e) Impose reasonable operating regulations on extraction facilities to minimize well interference, including requiring pumpers to operate on a rotation basis.

(f) Require extraction facilities to be registered with the district within 30 days of notice being given to the operator of the extraction facility.

(g) Require that the operator of a registered extraction facility provide the district annually with the following information regarding the extraction facility:

(1) The name and address of the operator of the extraction facility.

(2) The name and address of the owner of the land upon which the extraction facility is located.

(3) A description of the equipment associated with the extraction facility.

(4) The location of the water extraction facility.

(h) Require extraction facilities to be equipped with waterflow measuring devices installed and calibrated by the district or, at the district’s option, by the extraction facility
 operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37951.

When an extraction facility is equipped with a waterflow measuring device, the record of extraction, as disclosed by the waterflow measuring device, may, at the election of the board, be presumed to be accurate, and shall be used as the basis for computing the water extraction of the extraction facility in completing the groundwater extraction statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37952.

The district may, by ordinance, require proof of the accuracy of the waterflow measuring device from the operator and may, absent adequate proof of accuracy, order the operator, at the operator’s sole cost, to have the waterflow measuring device calibrated in a manner acceptable to the district. If the district has probable cause to believe that the extraction of groundwater from any extraction facility is in excess of the amount reported in groundwater extraction statements, or if no statements are filed covering an extraction facility, the district may investigate the extraction of water from each extraction facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37953.

The board may, by ordinance, establish reasonable methods to be used in computing the amount of water extracted by extraction facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37954.

The district may, by ordinance, require the operator of each extraction facility to file semiannually, or more frequently, with the district, a groundwater extraction statement that contains, but is not limited to, the following information:

(a) Total extraction in acre-feet of water from the extraction facility for the preceding groundwater extraction statement period.

(b) The static groundwater level for the extraction facility.

(c) A description of the location of the extraction facility.

(d) The crop types or other uses and the acreage served by the
 extraction facility.

(e) The method of measuring or computing groundwater extraction.

(f) Other information deemed reasonable and necessary by the board to meet the purposes of this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 561.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

37955.

If required by ordinance, each groundwater extraction statement shall be verified by a written declaration under penalty of perjury that the information contained in the statement is true and correct. The operator of an extraction facility that has been permanently abandoned after January 1, 2015, shall give written notice of the abandonment to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Groundwater Extraction Charges [37960. - 37969.]

37960.

The district may, by ordinance, levy groundwater extraction charges, including volumetric charges intended to provide an incentive for reduced water use, on the extraction of groundwater from all water extraction facilities within the territory of the district for the purposes of paying the costs of initiating, carrying on, and completing any of the powers, purposes, and groundwater management activities described in this act. Any groundwater extraction charges shall be uniform for groundwater extraction within the territory of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37961.

The Legislature hereby finds and determines that the groundwater management activities of the district are of equal benefit to all operators of groundwater extraction facilities within the territory of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37962.

If any operator of any extraction facility fails to pay a groundwater extraction charge when due, the district may charge and collect interest at the rate of 112 percent each month on the delinquent amount of the groundwater extraction charge. In addition, the district may exercise any of the provisions of Sections 75630 to 75633, inclusive, for the purpose of collecting delinquent groundwater extraction charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37963.

All moneys collected by the district pursuant to this act shall be available for expenditure by the district to carry out its groundwater management functions pursuant to this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37964.

The district may, by ordinance, establish an operator’s extraction allocation for each groundwater extraction facility located within the district. The district may, by ordinance, impose upon the operator of any groundwater extraction facility located within the district, extraction surcharges, including volumetric surcharges intended to provide an incentive for reduced water use, for extractions in excess of his or her extraction allocation and late penalties for nonpayment of extraction surcharges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37965.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares the following:

(a) Extraction allocations and extraction surcharges authorized pursuant to this chapter are necessary to eliminate overdraft caused by excess extractions from the aquifer systems within the district and to bring the groundwater basins underlying the territory to safe yield within 10 years of the formation of the district
 and to sustain that safe yield thereafter.

(b) The extraction surcharges are intended to discourage the use of groundwater beyond the extraction allocation. They are not intended to generate tax revenues or proceeds from regulatory licenses, user charges, or user fees. Consequently, they are not special taxes for purposes of Section 4 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution or proceeds of taxes for purposes of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37966.

The maximum amount of the extraction surcharge shall be two hundred dollars ($200) per acre-foot of groundwater extracted in excess of the extraction allocation, except that the district may increase the maximum amount of the extraction surcharge to an amount that is necessary to achieve safe yield.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37967.

If an operator of a groundwater extraction facility fails to pay the extraction surcharge when due, the district shall charge and collect a late penalty at the rate of 112 percent each month, or portion thereof, on the delinquent amount of the extraction surcharge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37968.

The district may bring a cause of action, in any court having jurisdiction, against an operator of a groundwater extraction facility for the collection of any delinquent extraction surcharge, and Article 5 (commencing with Section 75630) of Chapter 3 of Part 9 of Division 21 applies to those actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

37969.

In addition to any other authority, the district may order that an extraction surcharge or late penalty be a personal obligation of the operator or an assessment against the property on which the extraction facility is located. The assessment constitutes a lien upon the property, and the lien attaches upon recordation in the office of the county recorder. The assessment may be collected at the same time and in the same manner as
 ordinary ad valorem taxes are collected, and shall be subject to the same penalties and the same procedure and sale in case of delinquency as provided for those taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection, and enforcement of ad valorem taxes shall be applicable to an assessment, except that, if any real property to which the lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attaches thereon prior to the date on which the first installment of the taxes would become delinquent, the lien that would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to the real property and an assessment relating to the property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. REPEALS [38500. - 38501.]

38500.

Chapter 387 of the Statutes of 1913 is hereby repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

38501.

The repeal effected by this part shall not be construed to deprive any district or any person or other entity of any substantial right which would have existed or hereafter exist had such repeal not been effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14. CALIFORNIA WATER STORAGE DISTRICT LAW [39000. - 48401.]



PART 1. INTRODUCTORY PROVISIONS [39000. - 39082.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title [39000. - 39000.]

39000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Water Storage District Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [39010. - 39035.]

39010.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39011.

The definition of a word applies to any of its variants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39012.

“District” means any water storage district formed pursuant to the California Water Storage District Act or this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39013.

“Include,” except when used in relation to the inclusion of land into a district, does not necessarily exclude matters not enumerated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39014.

“Land,” except in Chapter 2 of Part 10, means land in the district or proposed district involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39015.

“Affected county” means any county in which land is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39016.

“Board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39017.

“President” means the president of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39018.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39019.

“Treasurer” means the treasurer of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39020.

“Holder of title” includes a holder of evidence of title and, also, a holder of land under a possessory right acquired by entry or purchase from the United States or the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39021.

“Property,” except in Part 9, embraces all real and personal property, including water, water rights, works, franchises, concessions and rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39022.

“Works” includes water works, conduits, reservoirs, storage sites, water sheds, machinery, wells, pumps, dams, storage tanks, tunnels, hydrants, meters, other appliances, and their appurtenances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39023.

“Conduit” includes canals, laterals, ditches, flumes, pipes, and their appurtenances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39024.

“Acquire” includes construct, purchase, lease, exchange, condemn, jointly acquire when joint acquisition is permitted, and contract to acquire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39025.

“Dispose” includes sell, contract to lease, contract to sell, and the making of any instrument necessary therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39026.

“Operate” includes use, maintain, and repair.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39027.

“General election” is the election required to be held in districts in each odd-numbered year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39028.

“Special election” means any election other than a general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39030.

“Acknowledged” means acknowledged and certified in the same form and manner as is required for recording of conveyances of real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39031.

“Office county” means the county in which the office of the district is kept.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39033.

“Other district” means any district or other public agency formed under any law of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 756.)
-------------------------------------------

39034.

“Principal county” means the county in which the greater portion of the land of a district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 779, Sec. 8.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

39035.

“Board of supervisors” means the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 779, Sec. 9.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Provisions [39050. - 39060.]

39050.

For all purposes of this division relating to signing petitions and voting at any election, and for all other purposes when the question of title to or value of land claimed to be owned by a petitioner or voter is involved, the most recent county assessment roll in each affected county, or the last final election roll prepared in accordance with Section 41027 if the board elects to follow the procedure provided in Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 41025) of Part 4, shall be sufficient evidence of ownership and value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1593, Sec. 1.6.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

39051.

If any parcel of land is assessed on any assessment roll to unknown or fictitiously named owners or to unnamed owners in addition to any owners named thereon, the parcel of land shall be deemed for any of the purposes of this division to have but one owner in addition to the owners whose true names may be purported to be given on the assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39052.

The holder of title to an undivided interest in land affected by any of the provisions of this division may sign any petition or vote at any election provided for in this division, and such undivided interest shall be counted and valued as though it were a separate interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39053.

If the assessment roll fails to indicate the extent of any undivided interest the holders of title whose undivided interests in any land are not specifically defined shall be deemed to have equal shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39054.

The certificate of the register of the United States Land Office for the district in which the land is situated, or of the State Lands Commission, is sufficient evidence of possessory right in any land entered under the laws of the United States or of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39055.

Guardians, conservators, personal representatives, and other persons holding land in a trust capacity under appointment of court may sign any petition and may vote at any election in behalf of the estate represented by them without obtaining special authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

39056.

A certificate of acknowledgment taken before a notary public or justice of the peace of any state, or an affidavit by any person in the presence of whom a petition was signed, is sufficient evidence of the genuineness of the signature and of the fact of place of residence of any petitioner under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39057.

Whenever any notice or publication, or notice of publication, or official advertising, or publication of process is required to be given or made by the provisions of this division, unless otherwise specifically provided, it shall be given or made once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation, printed and published in each affected county, and if in any such county there be no such newspaper then in a newspaper printed and published in an adjoining county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39058.

As to any land belonging to a person under guardianship or conservatorship or comprised in the undistributed estate of a decedent, the guardian or conservator of such person or executor or administrator of such estate shall be deemed the holder of title for the purpose of representing the same in all proceedings under this division, and has the right to sign all petitions or protests provided for in this division, and to vote at all district elections, without any order of court authorizing him so to do.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

39059.

The powers herein conferred upon the department and board are police and regulatory powers and are necessary to the accomplishment of a purpose that is indispensable to the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

39060.

The districts formed pursuant to this division are districts of the nature of irrigation, reclamation, or drainage districts in respect to all matters contemplated in the provisions of the Constitution of the State of California relating to irrigation, reclamation, or drainage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Department of Water Resources and State Treasurer [39080. - 39082.]



  ARTICLE 1. Powers and Duties [39080. - 39082.]

39080.

The department shall have the powers and duties conferred upon it by this division and further powers and authority necessary to enable it to fully perform the duties imposed upon it by this division, including the employment of any assistants it deems necessary, and the fixing of their compensation. The compensation of assistants and the cost and expense of all work done by the department pursuant to this division shall be paid by the district as provided in this division for payment of other expenses of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

39081.

The department shall give information, so far as may be practicable, to persons contemplating the formation of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39082.

Whenever the department deems it in the public interest that preliminary surveys and field investigations of proposed district projects shall be made at the expense of the State the department shall make the surveys and investigation and prepare a report thereof which shall be kept on file in its office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. FORMATION [39400. - 40104.]



  CHAPTER 1. Petition for Formation [39400. - 39466.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petitioners and Land [39400. - 39402.]

39400.

A majority in number of the holders of title to land irrigated or susceptible of irrigation from a common source and by the same system of works, who are also the holders of title to a majority in value of the land may propose the formation of a district under the provisions of this division or the formation of the district may be proposed by not less than 500 petitioners, each of whom is the holder of title to land therein and which petitioners include the holders of title to not less than 10 percent in value of the land included within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39401.

The proposed district may include land situated in other distinctive district agencies of the State, including other water storage districts having different plans and purposes and the object of which is not the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

39402.

The land proposed to be formed into a district need not consist of contiguous parcels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Petition [39425. - 39431.]

39425.

A petition for the formation of a district shall set forth generally:

(a) The boundaries of the proposed district or a description of the land.

(b) The proposed source or sources of water supply.

(c) The location proposed for the storage of water to be used for such irrigation, if storage is proposed.

(d) Any drainage or reclamation connected with the project.

(e) Any incidental development of hydroelectric energy.

(f) The nature of the proposed works.

(g) A prayer that the territory embraced within the proposed district be formed as a water storage district under the provisions of this division.

(h) The signatures to the petition.
